Florida, session 2026, SB1430.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âSubsection (1) of section 196.1975, Florida 12 Statutes, is amended to read: 13 196.1975âExemption for property used by nonprofit homes for 14 the aged.âNonprofit homes for the aged are exempt to the extent 15 that they meet the following criteria: 16 (1)âThe applicant must be a corporation not for profit 17 under pursuant to chapter 617 or a Florida limited partnership, 18 the sole general partner of which is either a corporation not 19 for profit under pursuant to chapter 617 or is wholly owned by a 20 corporation not for profit under chapter 617 and not licensed 21 under chapter 429, and the corporation not for profit must have 22 been exempt as of January 1 of the year for which exemption from 23 ad valorem property taxes is requested from federal income 24 taxation by having qualified as an exempt charitable 25 organization under the provisions of s. 501(c)(3) of the 26 Internal Revenue Code of 1954 or of the corresponding section of 27 a subsequently enacted federal revenue act. 28 Section 2.âThe amendments made by this act to s. 29 196.1975(1), Florida Statutes, first apply to the 2027 ad 30 valorem tax roll. 31 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect January 1, 2027.